Utah statutes.
75-7-409.   Noncharitable trust without ascertainable beneficiary.

A trust may be created for a noncharitable purpose without a definite or definitely ascertainable beneficiary or for a noncharitable but otherwise valid purpose to be selected by the trustee as provided in Section 75-2-1001.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

